California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
 United States directed to the attorney at his or her office, if known, and otherwise to the attorney’s residence, if known. If neither the attorney’s office nor residence is known, service may be made by delivering the notice or papers to the address of the attorney or party of record as designated on the court papers, or by delivering the notice or papers to the clerk of the court, for the attorney.

(b) If upon a party, service shall be made in the manner specifically provided in particular cases, or, if no specific provision is made, service may be made by leaving the notice or other paper at the party’s residence with some person 18 years of age or older.

(1) Any attempt of service upon a party at the party’s residence shall be made between the hours of 8 a.m. and 8 p.m.

 (2) If, at the time of service, as
 provided in paragraph (1), a person 18 years of age or older cannot be found at the party’s residence, the notice or papers may be served by mail.

(3) If the party’s residence is not known, any attempt of service pursuant to this subdivision may be made by delivering the notice or papers to the clerk of the court, for that party.

(c) If service is made by electronic service, it shall be made pursuant to Section 1010.6 and applicable rules on electric service in the California Rules of Court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   (AB 2286)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1012.

Service by mail may be made where the person on whom it is to be made resides or has his office at a place where there is a delivery service by mail, or where the person making the service and the person on whom it is to be made reside or have their offices in different places between which there is a regular communication by mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1931, Ch. 739.)
-------------------------------------------

1013.

(a) In case of service by mail, the notice or other paper shall be deposited in a post office, mailbox, subpost office, substation, or mail chute, or other like facility regularly maintained by the United States Postal Service, in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the person on whom it is to be served, at the office address as last given by that person on any document filed in the cause and served on the party making service by mail; otherwise at that party’s place of residence. Service is complete at the time of the deposit, but any period of notice and any right or duty to do any act or make any response within any period or on a date certain after service of the document, which time period or date is prescribed by statute or rule of
 court, shall be extended five calendar days, upon service by mail, if the place of address and the place of mailing is within the State of California, 10 calendar days if either the place of mailing or the place of address is outside the State of California but within the United States, 12 calendar days if the place of address is the Secretary of State’s address confidentiality program (Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), and 20 calendar days if either the place of mailing or the place of address is outside the United States, but the extension shall not apply to extend the time for filing notice of intention to move for new trial, notice of intention to move to vacate judgment pursuant to Section 663a, or notice of appeal. This extension applies in the absence of a specific exception provided for by this section or other statute or rule of
 court.

(b) The copy of the notice or other paper served by mail pursuant to this chapter shall bear a notation of the date and place of mailing or be accompanied by an unsigned copy of the affidavit or certificate of mailing.

(c) In case of service by Express Mail, the notice or other paper shall be deposited in a post office, mailbox, subpost office, substation, or mail chute, or other like facility regularly maintained by the United States Postal Service for receipt of Express Mail, in a sealed envelope, with Express Mail postage paid, addressed to the person on whom it is to be served, at the office address as last given by that person on any document filed in the cause and served on the party making service by Express Mail; otherwise at that party’s place of residence.
 In case of service by another method of delivery providing for overnight delivery, the notice or other paper shall be deposited in a box or other facility regularly maintained by the express service carrier, or delivered to an authorized courier or driver authorized by the express service carrier to receive documents, in an envelope or package designated by the express service carrier with delivery fees paid or provided for, addressed to the person on whom it is to be served, at the office address as last given by that person on any document filed in the cause and served on the party making service; otherwise at that party’s place of residence. Service is complete at the time of the deposit, but any period of notice and any right or duty to do any act or make any response within any period or on a date certain after service of the document served by Express Mail or other method of delivery providing for
 overnight delivery shall be extended by two court days. The extension shall not apply to extend the time for filing notice of intention to move for new trial, notice of intention to move to vacate judgment pursuant to Section 663a, or notice of appeal. This extension applies in the absence of a specific exception provided for by this section or other statute or rule of court.

(d) The copy of the notice or other paper served by Express Mail or another means of delivery providing for overnight delivery pursuant to this chapter shall bear a notation of the date and place of deposit or be accompanied by an unsigned copy of the affidavit or certificate of deposit.

(e) Service by facsimile transmission shall be permitted only where the parties agree and a written confirmation of that
 agreement is made. The Judicial Council may adopt rules implementing the service of documents by facsimile transmission and may provide a form for the confirmation of the agreement required by this subdivision. In case of service by facsimile transmission, the notice or other paper shall be transmitted to a facsimile machine maintained by the person on whom it is served at the facsimile machine telephone number as last given by that person on any document which they have filed in the cause and served on the party making the service. Service is complete at the time of transmission, but any period of notice and any right or duty to do any act or make any response within any period or on a date certain after service of the document, which time period or date is prescribed by statute or rule of court, shall be extended, after service by facsimile transmission, by two court days, but the extension
 shall not apply to extend the time for filing notice of intention to move for new trial, notice of intention to move to vacate judgment pursuant to Section 663a, or notice of appeal. This extension applies in the absence of a specific exception provided for by this section or other statute or rule of court.

(f) The copy of the notice or other paper served by facsimile transmission pursuant to this chapter shall bear a notation of the date and place of transmission and the facsimile telephone number to which transmitted, or to be accompanied by an unsigned copy of the affidavit or certificate of transmission which shall contain the facsimile telephone number to which the notice or other paper was transmitted.

(g) Electronic service shall be permitted pursuant to Section 1010.6 and the
 rules on electronic service in the California Rules of Court.

(h) Subdivisions (b), (d), and (f) are directory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 686, Sec. 2.   (AB 1726)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1013a.

Proof of service by mail may be made by one of the following methods:

(1) An affidavit setting forth the exact title of the document served and filed in the cause, showing the name and residence or business address of the person making the service, showing that he or she is a resident of or employed in the county where the mailing occurs, that he or she is over the age of 18 years and not a party to the cause, and showing the date and place of deposit in the mail, the name and address of the
 person served as shown on the envelope, and also showing that the envelope was sealed and deposited in the mail with the postage thereon fully prepaid.

(2) A certificate setting forth the exact title of the document served and filed in the cause, showing the name and business address of the person making the service, showing that he or she is an active member of the State Bar of California and is not a party to the cause, and showing the date and place of deposit in the mail, the name and address of the person served as shown on the envelope, and also showing that the envelope was sealed and deposited in the mail with the postage thereon fully prepaid.

(3) An affidavit setting forth the exact title of the document served and filed in the cause, showing (A) the name and residence or business address of the person making the service, (B) that he or she is a resident of, or employed
 in, the county where the mailing occurs, (C) that he or she is over the age of 18 years and not a party to the cause, (D) that he or she is readily familiar with the business’ practice for collection and processing of correspondence for mailing with the United States Postal Service, (E) that the correspondence would be deposited with the United States Postal Service that same day in the ordinary course of business, (F) the name and address of the person served as shown on the envelope, and the date and place of business where the correspondence was placed for deposit in the United States Postal Service, and (G) that the envelope was sealed and placed for collection and mailing on that date following ordinary business practices. Service made pursuant to this paragraph, upon motion of a party served, shall be presumed invalid if the postal cancellation date or postage meter date on the envelope is more than one day after the date of deposit for mailing contained in the affidavit.

(4) In case of service by the clerk of a court of record, a certificate by that clerk setting forth the exact title of the document served and filed in the cause, showing the name of the clerk and the name of the court of which he or she is the clerk, and that he or she is not a party to the cause, and showing the date and place of deposit in the mail, the name and address of the person served as shown on the envelope, and also showing that the envelope was sealed and deposited in the mail with the postage thereon fully prepaid. This form of proof is sufficient for service of process in which the clerk or deputy clerk signing the certificate places the document for collection and mailing on the date shown thereon, so as to cause it to be mailed in an envelope so sealed and so addressed on that date following standard court practices. Service made pursuant to this paragraph, upon motion of a party served and a finding of good cause by the court,
 shall be deemed to have occurred on the date of postage cancellation or postage meter imprint as shown on the envelope if that date is more than one day after the date of deposit for mailing contained in the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 576, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1013b.

(a) Proof of electronic service may be made by any of the following methods:

(1) An affidavit setting forth the exact title of the document served and filed in the cause, showing the name and residence or business address of the person making the service, showing that the person is a resident of or employed in the county where the electronic service occurs, and that the person
 is over 18 years of age.

(2) A certificate setting forth the exact title of the document served and filed in the cause, showing the name and business address of the person making the service, and showing that the person is an active member of the State Bar of California.

(3) An affidavit setting forth the exact title of the document served and filed in the cause, showing all of the following:

(A) The name and residence or business address of the person making the service.

 (B) That the person is a resident of, or employed in, the county where the electronic service occurs.

(C) That the person is over
 18 years of age.

 (D) That the person is readily familiar with the business’ practice for filing electronically.

 (E) That the document would be electronically served that same day in the ordinary course of business following ordinary business practices.

(4) In case of service by the clerk of a court of record, a certificate by that clerk setting forth the exact title of the document served and filed in the cause, showing the name of the clerk and the name of the court of which they are the clerk.

(b) Proof of electronic service shall include all of the following:

(1) The electronic service address and the residence or business address of the person making the electronic service.

(2) The date of electronic service.

(3) The name and electronic service address of the person served.

(4) A statement that the document was served electronically.

(c) Proof of electronic service shall be signed as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 1010.6.

(d) Proof of electronic service may be in electronic form and may be filed electronically with the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 215, Sec. 2.   (AB 2961)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1014.

A defendant appears in an action when the defendant answers, demurs, files a notice of motion to strike, files a notice of motion to transfer pursuant to Section 396b, moves for reclassification pursuant to Section 403.040, gives the plaintiff written notice of appearance, or when an attorney gives notice of appearance for the defendant. After appearance, a defendant or the defendant’s attorney is entitled to notice of all subsequent proceedings of which notice is required to be given. Where a defendant has not appeared, service of notice or papers need not be
 made upon the defendant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 344, Sec. 15.   Effective September 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1015.

When a plaintiff or a defendant, who has appeared, resides out of the state, and has no attorney in the action or proceeding, the service may be made on the clerk of the court, for that party. But in all cases where a party has an attorney in the action or proceeding, the service of papers, when required, must be upon the attorney instead of the party, except service of subpoenas, of writs, and other process issued in the suit, and of papers to bring the party into contempt. If the sole attorney for a party is removed or suspended from practice, then the party
 has no attorney within the meaning of this section. If the party’s sole attorney has no known office in this state, notices and papers may be served by leaving a copy thereof with the clerk of the court, unless the attorney has filed in the cause an address of a place at which notices and papers may be served on the attorney, in which event they may be served at that place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 263, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1016.

The foregoing provisions of this Chapter do not apply to the sevice of a summons or other process, or of any paper to bring a party into contempt.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1017.

Any summons, writ, or order in any civil suit or proceeding, and all other papers requiring service, may be transmitted by telegraph for service in any place, and the telegraphic copy of such writ, or order, or paper so transmitted, may be served or executed by the officer or person to whom it is sent for that purpose, and returned by him, if any return be requisite, in the same manner, and with the same force and effect in all respects, as the original thereof might be if delivered to him, and the officer or person serving or executing the same has the same authority, and is subject to the same liabilities, as if the copy were the original. The original, when a writ or order, must also be
 filed in the Court from which it was issued, and a certified copy thereof must be preserved in the telegraph office from which it was sent. In sending it, either the original or the certified copy may be used by the operator for that purpose. Whenever any document to be sent by telegraph bears a seal, either private or official, it is not necessary for the operator, in sending the same, to telegraph a description of the seal, or any words or device thereon, but the same may be expressed in the telegraphic copy of the letters “L. S.,” or by the word “seal.”

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1019.

Whenever any notice or publication is required by a provision in this code or any other code or statute of this state to be provided in a specified size of type or printing which is to be measured by points, the size required, unless otherwise specifically defined, shall be determined by the conventional customs and practices of the printing industry and within the tolerances permitted by conventional custom and practice in that industry, except that the provisions of this section shall not be used for purposes of evasion of any requirement for notice or publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 199, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1019.5.

(a) When a motion is granted or denied, unless the court otherwise orders, notice of the court’s decision or order shall be given by the prevailing party to all other parties or their attorneys, in the manner provided in this chapter, unless notice is waived by all parties in open court and is entered in the minutes.

(b) When a motion is granted or denied on the court’s own motion, notice of the court’s order shall be given by the court in the manner provided in this
 chapter, unless notice is waived by all parties in open court and is entered in the minutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1348, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1020.

(a) Any notice required by law, other than those required to be given to a party to an action or to his attorney, the service of which is not governed by the other sections of this chapter and which is not otherwise specifically provided for by law, may be given by sending the same by registered mail with proper postage prepaid addressed to the addressee’s last known address with request for return receipt, and the
 production of a returned receipt purporting to be signed by the addressee shall create a disputable presumption that such notice was received by the person to whom the notice was required to be sent.

(b) Electronic service is not authorized for a notice that requires certified or registered mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 4.5.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Of Costs [1021. - 1038.]

1021.

Except as attorney’s fees are specifically provided for by statute, the measure and mode of compensation of attorneys and counselors at law is left to the agreement, express or implied, of the parties; but parties to actions or proceedings are entitled to their costs, as hereinafter provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 377, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.4.

In an action for damages against a defendant based upon that defendant’s commission of a felony offense for which that defendant has been convicted, the court may, upon motion, award reasonable attorney’s fees to a prevailing plaintiff against the defendant who has been convicted of the felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 938, Sec. 3.   Effective September 20, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.5.

Upon motion, a court may award attorneys’ fees to a successful party against one or more opposing parties in any action which has resulted in the enforcement of an important right affecting the public interest if: (a) a significant benefit, whether pecuniary or nonpecuniary, has been conferred on the general public or a large class of persons, (b) the necessity and financial burden of private enforcement, or of enforcement by one public entity against another public entity, are such as to make the award appropriate, and (c) such fees should not in the interest
 of justice be paid out of the recovery, if any. With respect to actions involving public entities, this section applies to allowances against, but not in favor of, public entities, and no claim shall be required to be filed therefor, unless one or more successful parties and one or more opposing parties are public entities, in which case no claim shall be required to be filed therefor under Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

Attorneys’ fees awarded to a public entity pursuant to this section shall not be increased or decreased by a multiplier based upon extrinsic circumstances, as discussed in Serrano v. Priest, 20 Cal. 3d 25, 49.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 645, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.6.

Upon motion, a court after reviewing the evidence in the principal case may award attorney’s fees to a person who prevails on a claim for implied indemnity if the court finds (a) that the indemnitee through the tort of the indemnitor has been required to act in the protection of the indemnitee’s interest by bringing an action against or defending an action by a third person and (b) if that indemnitor was properly notified of the demand to bring the action or provide the defense and did not avail itself of the opportunity to do so, and (c) that the trier of fact determined that the indemnitee was without fault in the principal case which is the basis
 for the action in indemnity or that the indemnitee had a final judgment entered in his or her favor granting a summary judgment, a nonsuit, or a directed verdict.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1383, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.7.

In any action for damages arising out of the performance of a peace officer’s duties, brought against a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or against a public entity employing a peace officer or in an action for libel or slander brought pursuant to Section 45 or 46 of the Civil Code, the court may, in its discretion, award reasonable attorney’s fees to the defendant or defendants as part of the costs, upon a finding by the court that the action was not filed or maintained in good faith and with reasonable cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 980, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.8.

(a) Whenever the Attorney General prevails in a civil action to enforce Section 17537.3, 22445, 22446.5, 22958, 22962, or 22963 of the Business and Professions Code, Section 52, 52.1, 55.1, or 3494 of the Civil Code, the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code) or the California Commodity Law of 1990 (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 29500) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code), Section 1615, 2014, or 5650.1 of the Fish and Game Code, Section 4458, 12598, 12606, 12607, 12989.3, 16147, 66640, 66641, or 66641.7 of the Government Code, Section 13009, 13009.1, 19958.5, 25299, 39674, 41513, 42402, 42402.1, 42402.2, 42402.3, 42402.4, 43016, 43017, 43154, 104557, or 118950 of the Health and Safety Code, Section 308.1 or
 308.3 of the Penal Code, Section 2774.1, 4601.1, 4603, 4605, 30820, 30821.6, 30822, 42847, or 48023 of the Public Resources Code, Section 30101.7 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or Section 275, 1052, 1845, 13261, 13262, 13264, 13265, 13268, 13304, 13331, 13350, or 13385, or Part 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3, of the Water Code, the court shall award to the Attorney General all costs of investigating and prosecuting the action, including expert fees, reasonable attorney’s fees, and costs. Awards under this section shall be paid to the Public Rights Law Enforcement Special Fund established by Section 12530 of the Government Code.

(b) This section applies to any action pending on the effective date of this section and to any action filed thereafter.

(c) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 227 of the Statutes of 2004 shall apply to any action pending on
 the effective date of these amendments and to any action filed thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 3.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.9.

In any action to recover damages to personal or real property resulting from trespassing on lands either under cultivation or intended or used for the raising of livestock, the prevailing plaintiff shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees in addition to other costs, and in addition to any liability for damages imposed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1381, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.10.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in an action brought in the name of the people of the State of California against any person for failure to comply with Chapter 10A (commencing with Section 375) of Title 15 of the United States Code, otherwise known as the “Jenkins Act,” the court, to the extent not expressly prohibited by federal law, shall award fees and costs, including reasonable attorney’s fees, to the people if the people succeed on any claim to enforce the Jenkins Act. Any attorney’s fees awarded under this section shall be in addition to any
 other remedies or penalties available under all other laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 686, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.11.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any person, including an entity, attorney, or law firm, who seeks declaratory or injunctive relief to prevent this state, a political subdivision, a governmental entity or public official in this state, or a person in this state from enforcing any statute, ordinance, rule, regulation, or any other type of law that regulates or restricts firearms, or that represents any litigant seeking that
 relief, is jointly and severally liable to pay the attorney’s fees and costs of the prevailing party.

(b) For purposes of this section, a party is considered a prevailing party if a court does either of the following:

(1) Dismisses any claim or cause of action brought by the party seeking the declaratory or injunctive relief described by subdivision (a), regardless of the reason for the dismissal.

(2) Enters judgment in favor of the party opposing the declaratory or injunctive relief described by subdivision (a), on any claim or cause of action.

(c) Regardless of whether a prevailing party sought to recover attorney’s fees or costs in the
 underlying action, a prevailing party under this section may bring a civil action to recover attorney’s fees and costs against a person, including an entity, attorney, or law firm, that sought declaratory or injunctive relief described by subdivision (a) not later than the third anniversary of the date on which, as applicable:

(1) The dismissal or judgment described by subdivision (b) becomes final upon the conclusion of appellate review.

(2) The time for seeking appellate review expires.

(d) None of the following are a defense to an action brought under subdivision (c):

(1) A prevailing party under this section failed to seek recovery of attorney’s
 fees or costs in the underlying action.

(2) The court in the underlying action declined to recognize or enforce the requirements of this section.

(3) The court in the underlying action held that any provision of this section is invalid, unconstitutional, or preempted by federal law, notwithstanding the doctrines of issue or claim preclusion.

(e) Any person, including an entity, attorney, or law firm, who seeks declaratory or injunctive relief as described in subdivision (a), shall not be deemed a prevailing party under this section or any other provision of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 146, Sec. 2.   (SB 1327)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1022.

When several actions are brought on one bond, undertaking, promissory note, bill of exchange, or other instrument in writing, or in any other case for the same cause of action, against several parties who might have been joined as defendants in the same action, no costs can be allowed to the plaintiff in more than one of such actions, which may be at his election, if the party proceeded against in the other actions were, at the commencement of the previous action, openly within this State; but the disbursements of the plaintiff must be allowed to him in each action.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1023 by Stats. 1933, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

1023.

The fees of referees are such reasonable sum as the court may fix for the time spent in the business of the reference; but the parties may agree, in writing, upon any other rate of compensation, and thereupon such rates shall be allowed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 795.)
-------------------------------------------

1024.

When an application is made to the court or referee to postpone a trial, the payment of the expenses occasioned by the postponement may be imposed, in the discretion of the court or referee, as a condition of granting the same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 377, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1025.

When, in an action for the recovery of money only, the defendant alleges in his answer that before the commencement of the action he tendered to the plaintiff the full amount to which he was entitled, and thereupon deposits in court, for plaintiff, the amount so tendered, and the allegation is found to be true, the plaintiff can not recover costs, but must pay costs to the defendant.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1030 by Stats. 1933, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

1026.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), in an action prosecuted or defended by a personal representative, trustee of an express trust, guardian, conservator, or a person expressly authorized by statute, costs may be recovered as in an action by or against a person prosecuting or defending in the person’s own right.

(b) Costs allowed under subdivision (a) shall, by the judgment, be made chargeable only upon the estate, fund, or party represented, unless the court directs the costs to be paid by the fiduciary personally for mismanagement or bad faith in the action or
 defense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1199, Sec. 8.   Operative July 1, 1989, by Sec. 119 of Ch. 1199.)
-------------------------------------------

1027.

When the decision of a court of inferior jurisdiction in a special proceeding is brought before a court of higher jurisdiction for a review, in any other way than by appeal, the same costs must be allowed as in cases on appeal, and may be collected in the manner provided for enforcement of money judgments generally, or in such manner as the court may direct, according to the nature of the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 68.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

1028.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, when the State is a party, costs shall be awarded against it on the same basis as against any other party and, when awarded, must be paid out of the appropriation for the support of the agency on whose behalf the State appeared.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

1028.5.

(a) In any civil action between a small business or a licensee and a state regulatory agency, involving the regulatory functions of a state agency as applied to a small business or a licensee, if the small business or licensee prevails, and if the court determines that the action of the agency was undertaken without substantial justification, the small business or licensee may, in the discretion of the court, be awarded reasonable litigation expenses in addition to other costs. Funds for such expenses and costs shall be paid from funds in the regular operating budget of the state regulatory agency where the appropriation therefor
 encompasses the payment of such costs and expenses, and not from unappropriated money in the General Fund.

(b) “Reasonable litigation expenses” means any expenses not in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) which the judge finds were reasonably incurred in opposing the agency action, including court costs, expenses incurred in administrative proceedings, attorney’s fees, witness fees of all necessary witnesses, and such other expenses as were reasonably incurred.

(c) “Small business” means a business activity that is all of the following: 

(1) Independently owned and operated.

(2) Not dominant in its field of operation.

(3) Not exceeding the following annual gross
 receipts or other criteria in the categories of:

(A) Agriculture, one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(B) General construction, nine million five hundred thousand dollars ($9,500,000).

(C) Special trade construction, five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(D) Retail trade, two million dollars ($2,000,000).

(E) Wholesale trade, nine million five hundred thousand dollars ($9,500,000). 

(F) Services, two million dollars ($2,000,000).

(G) Transportation and warehousing, one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000).

(H) A manufacturing enterprise not exceeding 250 employees.

(I) A health care facility not exceeding 150 beds or one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in annual gross receipts.

(J) Generating and transmitting electric power not exceeding 4,500 megawatt hours annually.

(d) “Licensee” means any person licensed by a state agency who does not qualify as a small business, but whose annual gross receipts from the use of such license do not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(e) A small business or a licensee shall be deemed to prevail in any action in which there is no adjudication, stipulation, or acceptance of liability on the part of the small business or licensee.

(f) A small business or licensee shall not be deemed to have prevailed in actions commenced at the instance of, or on the basis of a complaint filed by, a person who is not an officer, employee, or other agent of the state regulatory agency if the action is dismissed by the agency upon a finding of no cause for the action, or is settled by the agency and small business or licensee without a finding of fault.

(g) Section 800 of the Government Code shall not apply to actions which are subject to the provisions of this section.

(h) Every state regulatory agency against which litigation expenses have been awarded under this section shall, at the time of submission of its proposed budget pursuant to Section 13320 of the Government Code, submit a report to the Department of Finance and the Legislature as to the amount of
 those expenses awarded and paid during the fiscal year.

(i) This section shall be known and may be cited as the Carpenter-Katz Small Business Equal Access to Justice Act of 1981.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 445, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1029.

When any county, city, district, or other public agency or entity, or any officer thereof in his official capacity, is a party, costs shall be awarded against it on the same basis as against any other party and, when awarded, must be paid out of the treasury thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

1029.5.

(a) Whenever a complaint for damages is filed against any architect, landscape architect, engineer, building designer, or land surveyor, duly licensed as such under the laws of this state, in an action for error, omission, or professional negligence in the creation and preparation of plans, specifications, designs, reports or surveys which are the basis for work performed or agreed to be performed on real property, any such defendant may, within 30 days after service of summons, move the court for an order, upon notice and hearing, requiring the plaintiff to file an undertaking in a sum not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500)
 as security for the costs of defense as provided in subdivision (d), which may be awarded against the plaintiff. The motion shall be supported by affidavit showing that the claim against the defendant is frivolous.

At the hearing upon the motion, the court shall order the plaintiff to file the undertaking if the defendant shows to the satisfaction of the court that (i) the plaintiff would not suffer undue economic hardship in filing the undertaking, and (ii) there is no reasonable possibility that the plaintiff has a cause of action against each named defendant with respect to whom the plaintiff would otherwise be required to file the undertaking. No appeal shall be taken from any order made pursuant to this subdivision to file or not to file the undertaking. 

A determination by the court that the undertaking either shall or shall not be filed or shall be filed as to one or more defendants and not as to others, shall not be
 deemed a determination of any one or more issues in the action or of the merits thereof. If the court, upon any such motion, makes a determination that an undertaking be filed by the plaintiff as to any one or more defendants, the action shall be dismissed as to the defendant or defendants, unless the undertaking required by the court has been filed within such reasonable time as may be fixed by the court.

(b) This section does not apply to a complaint for bodily injury or for wrongful death, nor to an action commenced in a small claims court.

(c) Whenever more than one such defendant is named, the undertaking shall be increased to the extent of not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each additional defendant in whose favor the undertaking is ordered not to exceed the total of three thousand dollars ($3,000).

(d) In any action requiring an undertaking as provided in this section, upon the dismissal of the action or the award of judgment to the defendant, the court shall require the plaintiff to pay the defendant’s costs of defense authorized by law. Any sureties shall be liable for such costs in an amount not to exceed the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) or the amount of the undertaking, whichever is lesser, for each defendant with respect to whom the sureties have executed an undertaking.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 162.)
-------------------------------------------

1029.6.
